Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202670-2204
Public power suppliers; procedures for load management.

Public power suppliers shall develop a procedure to:

(1) Procure demand response, reductions, and load flexibility from large load customers; and

(2) In the event of grid instability or an emergency condition, require the affected large load customers to curtail load or, for those customers with onsite backup generating facilities, to deploy such facilities for the duration of the grid instability or emergency condition or until the load can be recalled safely.

Laws 2026, LB1010, § 4.
July 18, 2026